Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE D. HISTORY, CULTURE, AND EDUCATION

CHAPTER 450. EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS TO ADVANCE THE TEACHING OF TEXAS HISTORY

Sec. 450.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. In this chapter "charitable historical organization" means an entity that:

(1) is organized as a nonprofit organization;

(2) has its main office at an institution of higher education, as that term is defined under Section 61.003, Education Code; and

(3) maintains an established educational department that provides:

(A) opportunities for students in this state to study and work to preserve the history, heritage, and symbols of this state; and

(B) training and resources to assist educators in developing effective strategies to teach students about the heritage, history, and symbols of this state.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 2549), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 450.002. FUNDING. For the purposes of Subchapter I, Chapter 659:

(1) a charitable historical organization is considered an eligible charitable organization entitled to participate in a state employee charitable campaign; and

(2) a state employee is entitled to authorize a deduction for contributions to a charitable historical organization as a charitable contribution under Section 659.132, and the organization may use the contributions for the purpose of administering and providing educational outreach programs established by the organization.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 2549), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.